California statutes. Education Code
(a) Before December 17, 2012, the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Superintendent, shall determine the amount of funding that would have been provided in the 2011–12 fiscal year to school districts and community college districts if the revenues described in subdivision (a) of Section 41210 were General Fund revenues for purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) For each of the 2012–13 to 2016–17, inclusive, fiscal years, 17.8 percent of the amount determined in subdivision (a) is appropriated
 from the General Fund to the Superintendent and shall be distributed in the following priority:

(1) To reduce amounts deferred under Section 14041.6.

(2) To repay obligations to school districts and county offices of education under Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(3) To use for other one-time purposes as provided by statute enacted after the effective date of this section.

(c) For each of the 2012–13 to 2016–17, inclusive, fiscal years, 2.2 percent of the amount determined in subdivision (a) is appropriated from the General Fund to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and shall be distributed in the following priority:

(1) To reduce amounts deferred under Section 84321.6.

(2) To repay obligations to community college districts under Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(3) To use for other one-time purposes as provided by statute enacted after the effective date of this section.

(d) For the 2011–12 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years, the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution shall include the amount determined in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 43, Sec. 16.   (AB 114)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Applicable, by its own provisions, upon inoperation of  Section 41210.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State School Fund [41300. - 41455.]



  ARTICLE 1. Appropriations, Sources, Conditions, Amounts of Support per Average Daily Attendance [41300. - 41311.]

41300.

Commencing with July 1, 1980, the amount transferred to Section A of the State School Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14002 shall be expended for basic aid, equalization aid, allowances for adults, and allowances to the county school tuition funds to be apportioned on account of average daily attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

41300.1.

Instructional Improvement and Accountability.

The amount transferred to Section A of the State School Fund pursuant to Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the State Constitution shall to the maximum extent feasible be expended or encumbered during the fiscal year received and solely for the purpose of instructional improvement and accountability.

(a) For the purpose of this section, “instructional improvement and accountability” shall mean expenditures for instructional activities for school sites which directly benefit the instruction of students, and shall be limited to expenditures for the following:

(1) Lower pupil-teacher ratios until a ratio is attained of not more than 20 students per teacher providing direct instruction in any class, and until a goal is attained of total teacher loads of less than 100 total students per teacher in all secondary school classes in academic subjects as defined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(2) Instructional supplies, instructional equipment, instructional materials and support services necessary to improve school conditions.

(3) Direct student services needed to ensure that each student makes academic progress necessary to be promoted to the next appropriate grade level.

(4) Staff development which improves services to students or increases the quality and effectiveness of instructional staff, designed and implemented by classroom teachers and other participating school district personnel, including the school principal, with the aid of outside personnel as necessary. Classroom teachers shall comprise the majority of any group designated to design such staff development programs for instructional personnel.

(5) Compensation of teachers.

(b) Funds transferred to each school district, pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a separate account and shall be maintained and appropriated separately from funds from all other sources. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall supplement other resources of each school district and shall not supplant any other funds.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 98, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

41301.

The amount transferred to Section A of the State School Fund pursuant to Section 14002 and Section 14004 shall be expended in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) Twenty-six dollars and ninety-five cents ($26.95) multiplied by the total average daily attendance credited during the preceding school year to elementary school districts which during the preceding school year had less than 901 units of average daily attendance, to high school districts which during the preceding school year had less than 301 units of average daily attendance, and to unified districts which during the preceding school year had less than 1,501 units of average daily attendance, but not to exceed an amount equal to ninety-nine cents ($0.99) multiplied by the average daily attendance credited during the preceding fiscal year to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state, for allowance to county school service funds pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14054.

Commencing with the 1980–81 fiscal year, the amounts in this subdivision shall be increased annually by the same percentage prescribed by Section 14002.5.

(b) Fourteen dollars and thirty-five cents ($14.35) multiplied by the total average daily attendance credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state, during the preceding school year for the purposes of Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 5 of this part.

(c) Thirty-eight dollars and thirty cents ($38.30) multiplied by the total average daily attendance credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state, during the preceding school year, for the purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 56030) of Chapter 1, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56500), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56700) of Part 30 of Division 4 of this title, and Sections 41863, 41866, 41892, and 41897.

(d) Four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) multiplied by the total average daily attendance credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state during the preceding school year for allowances to county school service funds pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14054.

Commencing with the 1980–81 fiscal year, the amount in this subdivision shall be increased by the same percentage allowed in Section 14002.5.

(e) Three dollars and sixty-nine cents ($3.69) multiplied by the average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state for allowances to school districts for the purposes of Section 52205. The amount in this subdivision shall be annually increased by the percentage specified in subdivision (e) of Section 14002.

(f) One thousand three hundred sixty-four dollars and seventy-one cents ($1,364.71) multiplied by the average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state during the preceding school year for basic aid, equalization aid, allowances for adults, and allowances to the county school tuition funds to be apportioned on account of average daily attendance. The amount expended pursuant to this subdivision shall be annually revised to reflect the adjustment prescribed by subdivision (e) of Section 14002.

(g) Twenty dollars and seventy cents ($20.70) multiplied by the average daily attendance during the preceding school year credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state for purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 56600) of Part 30 of Division 4 of this title.

(h) Ninety cents ($0.90) multiplied by the average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state for purposes of Article 8 (commencing with Section 8150) of Chapter 1 of Part 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 37.46.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

41302.5.

For the purposes of Section 8 and Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, “school districts” shall include county boards of education, county superintendents of schools, and direct elementary and secondary level instructional services provided by the state, including the Diagnostic Schools for Neurologically Handicapped Children as established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 59200) of Chapter 3 of Part 32.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 703, Sec. 5.   Effective September 15, 1992.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

41303.

The Superintendent shall report to the Controller, on or before the 20th day of October of each year, the total average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year credited to all kindergarten, including average daily attendance for transitional kindergarten, elementary, high school, and adult schools in the state and to county school tuition funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 23.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

41304.

(a) There is appropriated annually from the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund to the General Fund in the State Treasury and from the General Fund to the California Energy Extension Service of the Office of Planning and Research a sum as necessary to establish and maintain a unit for driver instruction within the State Department of Education as set forth in Section 41904.

(b) In addition, subject to Section 41305, there shall be appropriated from the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund to the General Fund, then to the State School Fund each fiscal year, the sum the Superintendent of Public Instruction certifies as necessary to reimburse on a quarterly basis for each current fiscal year school districts, county superintendents of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education for the actual cost of instructing pupils in the operation of motor vehicles.

The amount shall not exceed ninety-seven dollars ($97) per pupil instructed in the laboratory phase of driver education in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Board of Education.

(c) Subject to Section 41305, there shall also be appropriated from the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund the sum the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall certify as necessary to reimburse on a quarterly basis for each current fiscal year school districts, county superintendents of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education for the actual cost of replacing vehicles and simulators used exclusively in the laboratory phase of driver education programs, but the amount shall not exceed three-fourths of that part of the actual cost of instructing pupils in the laboratory phase of driver education which is: (1) in excess of ninety-seven dollars ($97) per pupil instructed, and (2) expended by the district, the county superintendent of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education in replacing the vehicles and simulators. Reimbursement for vehicles shall be computed for only that portion of the total mileage used exclusively in the laboratory phase of driver education programs.

(d) In addition, subject to Section 41305, there shall be provided from the Petroleum Violation Escrow Account to the General Fund, then to the State School Fund each fiscal year the sum the Superintendent of Public Instruction certifies as necessary to reimburse on a quarterly basis for each current fiscal year school districts, county superintendents of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education for the costs of fitting automobile driver training vehicles with the instrumentation required under Section 51854 and to reimburse on a quarterly basis for each current fiscal year school districts for the costs of transferring instrumentation providing instructional information on fuel consumption and vehicle fuel efficiency from one automobile driver training vehicle to another under Section 51854.

(e) In addition, subject to Section 41305, there shall be appropriated from the Petroleum Violation Escrow Account to the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund and from the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund to the General Fund, then to the Superintendent of Public Instruction each fiscal year the sum the Superintendent of Public Instruction certifies as necessary to reimburse on a quarterly basis for each current fiscal year the State Department of Education for the costs of workshops conducted by the department under Section 51854.

(f) For purposes of computing reimbursement, whenever a school district, a county superintendent of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, or the State Department of Education replaces a driver training vehicle or simulator purchased by the district with a vehicle or simulator that is a gift or loan, the purchase price of the new or acquired equipment shall be deemed to be the market value of the vehicle or simulator acquired through a gift or loan.

A simulator is any device approved by the State Department of Education to be used in classrooms for purposes of laboratory instruction under simulated driving conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 924, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 924.)
-------------------------------------------

41305.

The amounts provided under Section 41304 for any fiscal year shall be limited to the amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the purposes of that section, and shall not exceed an amount equal to the sum of the moneys credited to the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund in the State Treasury during the preceding fiscal year and the amount by which the deposits in the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund on or after September 15, 1961, have exceeded the amounts required to reimburse the General Fund on account of transfers made after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41306.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall also allow as otherwise provided in Section 41304 for the driver training instruction necessary to be safely tested for a driver’s license at the Department of Motor Vehicles, those physically handicapped pupils, pupils with intellectual disabilities who come within the provisions of former Section 56501, as amended by Chapter 1247 of the Statutes of 1977, and educationally handicapped pupils who are in attendance in a public secondary school in California that offers qualified instruction, and who may qualify for a driver’s license, or other license, issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, a total allowance not to exceed two hundred ninety dollars ($290) including the reimbursement provisions set forth in Section
 41900 to each school district and county superintendent of schools. All driver training for pupils herein described shall be provided by qualified teachers, as defined by Sections 41906 and 41907. This section may not be applied if reimbursement allowable under Sections 41900 to 41912, inclusive, is sufficient to meet the total cost of instruction as herein described.

It is the intent of the Legislature that driver training instruction be provided to pupils as a part of the high school curriculum, and the Legislature finds and declares that exceptional children are entitled to the benefit of that instruction so far as their individual capabilities permit, understanding that those pupils herein described often require individualized and amplified driver training instruction in order to succeed in becoming safe operators of motor vehicles. Since without a means of self-transportation much of the overall program of education and rehabilitation provided for by the
 Legislature would be of little avail to the person without the mobility required to become a productive and well-adjusted member of society, the Legislature further declares that it is incumbent upon the state to share in the cost of providing a most needed and desirable program of driver training instruction for these exceptional children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 10.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

41307.

In addition there shall be provided such amount as the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall certify as necessary to provide the allowances to school districts during each fiscal year under the provisions of Sections 41932 to 41936, inclusive. Such amount is hereby appropriated from the Investment Fund in the State Treasury and shall be transferred therefrom to the State School Fund by the State Controller each fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41308.

Each pregnant pupil enrolled in any program for physically handicapped pupils maintained by a county superintendent of schools, whose only condition for being enrolled in such a program is her pregnancy, shall be allowed to enroll in automobile driver training provided by the school district of residence; however, the school district shall receive, for the driver training instruction of the pupil, only the driver training allowances authorized by Section 41900 and shall not receive, for the driver training instruction of the pupil, driver training allowances authorized by Section 41306.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41311.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Child Nutrition Program shall provide permanent financial assistance to eligible school districts, county superintendents of schools, local agencies, private schools, parochial schools, and child development programs, for implementing the school meal program. That financial assistance shall be used to reimburse the cafeteria account of school districts, county superintendents of schools, local agencies, private schools, parochial schools, and child development programs, based upon the number of qualifying meals served to students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1546, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Emergency Apportionments [41320. - 41322.]

41320.

As a condition to any emergency apportionment to be made pursuant to Section 41320.2, the following requirements shall be met:

(a) The school district requesting the apportionment shall submit to the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the school district a report issued by an independent auditor approved by the county superintendent of schools on the financial conditions and budgetary controls of the school district, a written management review conducted by a qualified management consultant approved by the county superintendent of schools, and a fiscal plan adopted by the governing board to resolve the financial problems of the school district.

(b) The county
 superintendent of schools shall review, and provide written comment on, the independent auditor’s report, the management review, and the school district plan. That written comment shall include the county superintendent’s approval or disapproval of the school district plan. In the event the county superintendent disapproves the plan, the governing board shall revise the school district plan to respond to the concerns expressed by the county superintendent.

(c) Upon his or her approval of the school district plan, the county superintendent of schools shall submit copies of the report, review, plan, and written comments specified in subdivision (b) to the Superintendent, the Joint Legislative Audit Committee, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Director of Finance, the president of the state board or his or her designee, and the Controller.

(d) The school district receiving
 the apportionment shall be eligible for assistance from the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence pursuant to Section 52074.

(e) The county superintendent of schools, with the concurrence of the Superintendent, shall certify to the Director of Finance that the action taken to correct the financial problems of the school district is realistic and will result in placing the school district on a sound financial basis.

(f) The school district shall develop a schedule to repay the emergency loan, including any lease financing pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 41329.50), and submit it to the county superintendent of schools. The county superintendent of schools shall review and comment on the repayment schedule and submit it to the Superintendent for approval or disapproval. Upon the approval of the repayment schedule, and of the other reports, reviews,
 plans, and the appointment of the trustee required by this article, the Superintendent shall request the Controller to disburse the proceeds of the emergency loan to the school district.

(g) The school district requesting the apportionment shall reimburse the county superintendent of schools for the costs incurred by the superintendent pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 6.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

41320.1.

Acceptance by the school district of the apportionments made pursuant to Section 41320 constitutes the agreement by the school district to all of the following conditions:

(a) The county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent, and the president of the state board or his or her designee shall, by majority vote, appoint a trustee from a pool of candidates identified and vetted by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team pursuant to subdivision (b) who has recognized expertise in management and finance and may employ, on a short-term basis, staff necessary to assist the trustee, including, but not limited to, certified public accountants, as follows:

(1) The expenses incurred by the trustee and
 necessary staff shall be borne by the school district.

(2) The county superintendent of schools, with concurrence from both the Superintendent and the president of the state board or his or her designee, shall establish the terms and conditions of the employment, including the remuneration of the trustee. The trustee shall report directly to the county superintendent of schools. The county superintendent of schools shall provide regular updates to the Superintendent and the president of the state board or his or her designee regarding the work of the trustee.

(3) The trustee, and necessary staff, shall serve until the school district has adequate fiscal systems and controls in place, the Superintendent has determined that the school district’s future compliance with the fiscal plan approved for the school district pursuant to Section 41320 is probable, and the county
 superintendent of schools, the Superintendent, and the president of the state board or his or her designee decide to terminate the trustee’s appointment, but in no event for less than three years. The county superintendent of schools shall notify the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Controller no less than 60 days before the time that the county superintendent of schools expects these conditions to be met.

(4) Before the school district repays the loan, including interest, the recipient of the loan shall select an auditor from a list established by the Superintendent and the Controller to conduct an audit of its fiscal systems. If the fiscal systems are deemed to be inadequate, the county superintendent of schools, with concurrence from both the Superintendent and the president of the state board or his or her designee, may retain the trustee until the deficiencies are corrected. The cost of this audit and any additional cost of
 the trustee shall be borne by the school district.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, all reports submitted to the trustee are public records.

(6) To facilitate the appointment of the trustee and the employment of necessary staff, this section is exempt from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(7) If the trustee appointed pursuant to this section is an employee of the department, the salary and benefits of that employee shall be established by the Superintendent and paid by the school district. During the time of appointment, the employee is an employee of the school district, but shall remain in the same retirement system under the same plan as if
 the employee had remained in the department. Upon the expiration or termination of the appointment, the employee shall have the right to return to his or her former position, or to a position at substantially the same level as that position, with the department. The time served in the appointment shall be counted for all purposes as if the employee had served that time in his or her former position with the department.

(b) The County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, when selecting the pool of candidates for trustee, shall consider candidates’ expertise in management and finance, previous experience mitigating fiscal distress in school districts, and ability to meaningfully engage with the community that the school district serves, and shall provide an opportunity for public input on the selection of the pool of candidates for trustee.

(c) (1) The trustee appointed pursuant to this section shall monitor and review the operation of the school district. During the period of his or her service, the trustee may stay or rescind an action of the governing board of the school district that, in the judgment of the trustee, may affect the financial condition of the school district.

(2) After the trustee’s period of service, and until the loan is repaid, the county superintendent of schools that has jurisdiction over the school district may stay or rescind an action of the governing board of the school district that, in his or her judgment, may affect the financial condition of the school district. The county superintendent of schools shall notify the Superintendent and the president of the state board or his or her designee, within five business days, if he or she stays or rescinds an action of the governing board of the school district. The notice shall include, but not be
 limited to, both of the following:

(A) A description of the governing board of the school district’s intended action and its financial implications.

(B) The rationale and findings that support the county superintendent of school’s decision to stay or rescind the action of the governing board of the school district.

(3) If the county superintendent of schools notifies the Superintendent and the president of the state board or his or her designee pursuant to paragraph (2), the county superintendent of schools shall report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before December 30 of every year, whether the school district is complying with the fiscal plan approved for the school district.

(4) The county superintendent of
 schools, with concurrence from the Superintendent, may establish timelines and prescribe formats for reports and other materials to be used by the trustee to monitor and review the operations of the school district. The trustee shall approve or reject all reports and other materials required from the school district as a condition of receiving the apportionment. The Superintendent, upon the recommendation of the trustee, may reduce an apportionment to the school district in an amount up to two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each late or unacceptable report or other material required under this part, and shall report to the Legislature a failure of the school district to comply with the requirements of this section. If the county superintendent of schools determines, at any time, that the fiscal plan approved for the school district under Section 41320 is unsatisfactory, he or she may modify the plan as necessary, with concurrence from the Superintendent, and the school district shall comply with the plan
 as modified.

(d) At the request of the county superintendent of schools, with approval from the Superintendent, the Controller shall transfer to the department, from an apportionment to which the school district would otherwise have been entitled pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, the amount necessary to pay the expenses incurred by the trustee and associated costs incurred by the county superintendent of schools.

(e) For the fiscal year in which the apportionments are disbursed and every year thereafter, the Controller, or an auditor that is designated by the Controller as both active and able to perform K–12 local education agency audits, shall cause an audit to be conducted of the books and accounts of the school district, in lieu of the audit required by Section 41020. At the Controller’s discretion, the audit may be conducted by the Controller,
 his or her designee, an auditor that is designated by the Controller as both active and able to perform K–12 local education agency audits, or an auditor selected by the school district and approved by the Controller. The costs of these audits shall be borne by the school district. These audits shall be required until the Controller determines, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools and the Superintendent, that the school district is financially solvent, but in no event earlier than one year following the implementation of the plan or later than the time the apportionment made is repaid, including interest. The auditor selected pursuant to this subdivision, if any, the county superintendent of schools, a County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team representative, the Superintendent, and the school district superintendent, or their respective designees, shall meet before the audit to discuss the terms of the audit and the timeline under which it will proceed. In addition, the
 Controller shall conduct quality control reviews pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14504.2.

(f) For purposes of errors and omissions liability insurance policies, the trustee appointed pursuant to this section is an employee of the local educational agency to which he or she is assigned. For purposes of workers’ compensation benefits, the trustee is an employee of the local educational agency to which he or she is assigned, except that a trustee appointed pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) is an employee of the department for those purposes.

(g) Except for an individual appointed by the vote pursuant to subdivision (a) as a trustee described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), the trustee appointed pursuant to this section is a member of the State Teachers’ Retirement System, if qualified, for the period of service as trustee, unless the trustee elects in writing
 not to become a member. A person who is a member or retirant of the State Teachers’ Retirement System at the time of appointment shall continue to be a member or retirant of the system for the duration of the appointment. If the trustee chooses to become a member or is already a member, the trustee shall be placed on the payroll of the school district for the purpose of providing appropriate contributions to the system. The Superintendent may also require that an individual appointed as a trustee described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) be placed on the payroll of the school district for purposes of remuneration, other benefits, and payroll deductions. For purposes of workers’ compensation benefits, the state-appointed trustee is deemed an employee of the local educational agency to which he or she is assigned, except that a trustee who is described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) is an employee of the department for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 7.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

41320.2.

(a) The governing board of a school district that determines during a fiscal year that its revenues are less than the amount necessary to meet its current year expenditure obligations may request an emergency apportionment through the Superintendent of Public Instruction subject to the requirements and repayment provisions of this article and Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 41329.50).

(b) It is not the intent of the Legislature that this section authorize emergency loans to school districts for the purpose of meeting cashflow requirements pending the receipt of local taxes and other funds.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that emergency apportionments, as described in this section, not occur, unless funds have been specifically appropriated therefor by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

41321.

(a) On or before October 31 of the year following receipt of an emergency apportionment, and each year thereafter, until the emergency apportionment, including interest, is repaid, the governing board of the school district shall prepare a report on the financial condition of the school district. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) Specific actions taken to reduce expenditures or increase income, and the cost savings and increased income resulting from those actions.

(2) A copy of the adopted budget for the current fiscal year.

(3) Reserves for economic uncertainties.

(4) Status of employee contracts.

(5) Obstacles to the implementation of the adopted recovery plan.

(b) The school district shall submit the report to the trustee for review. Upon the trustee’s approval of the report, the school district shall transmit copies to the county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent, the president of the state board or his or her designee, and the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 8.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

41322.

(a) If a trustee has been appointed over a school district pursuant to Section 41320.1, the trustee may stay or rescind the actions of the personnel commission of the school district if a personnel commission exists.

(b) If an administrator has been appointed over a school district pursuant to Section 41326, the administrator shall suspend the actions of the personnel commission of the school district if a personnel commission exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 924, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Conditions on Emergency Apportionments [41325. - 41329.]

41325.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that when a school district becomes insolvent and requires an emergency apportionment from the state in the amount designated in this article, it is necessary that the county superintendent of schools, under the supervision of the Superintendent, assume control of the school district in order to ensure the school district’s return to fiscal solvency.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that an administrator, appointed pursuant to Section 41326, do all of the following:

(1) Implement substantial changes in the school district’s fiscal policies and practices, including, if necessary, the filing of a petition under Chapter 9 of the federal Bankruptcy Code for the
 adjustment of indebtedness.

(2) Revise the school district’s educational program to reflect realistic income projections, in response to the dramatic effect of the changes in fiscal policies and practices upon educational program quality and the potential for the success of all pupils.

(3) Encourage all members of the school community to accept a fair share of the burden of the school district’s fiscal recovery.

(4) Consult, for the purposes described in this subdivision, with the school district governing board, the exclusive representatives of the employees of the school district, parents, and the community.

(5) Consult with and seek recommendations from the county superintendent of schools and the Superintendent for the purposes described in this
 subdivision.

(c) For purposes of this article, the county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent, and the president of the state board or his or her designee may also appoint a trustee with the powers and responsibilities of an administrator, as set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 9.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

41326.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the acceptance by a school district of an apportionment made pursuant to Section 41320 that exceeds an amount equal to 200 percent of the amount of the reserve recommended for that school district under the standards and criteria adopted pursuant to Section 33127 constitutes the agreement by the school district to the conditions set forth in this article. Before applying for an emergency apportionment in the amount identified in this subdivision, the governing board of a school district shall discuss the need for that apportionment at a regular or special meeting of the governing board of the school district and, at that meeting, shall receive testimony regarding the apportionment from parents, exclusive representatives of employees of the school district, and other members of
 the community. For purposes of this article, “qualifying school district” means a school district that accepts a loan as described in this subdivision.

(b) The county superintendent of schools shall assume all the legal rights, duties, and powers of the governing board of a qualifying school district. The county superintendent of schools, with concurrence from both the Superintendent and the president of the state board or his or her designee, shall appoint an administrator from a pool of candidates identified and vetted by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team pursuant to subdivision (c) to exercise the authority described in this subdivision in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The administrator shall serve under the direction and supervision of the county superintendent of schools, with concurrence from both the Superintendent and the president